Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20259-1110
Sports wagering.

(1) The commission may permit an authorized gaming operator to conduct sports wagering. Any sports wager shall be placed in person or at a wagering kiosk in the designated sports wagering area at the licensed racetrack enclosure. A parimutuel wager in accordance with sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 may be placed in the designated sports wagering area at the licensed racetrack enclosure. An individual employed and authorized to accept a sports wager may also accept a parimutuel wager.

(2) A floor plan identifying the designated sports wagering area, including the location of any wagering kiosks, shall be filed with the commission for review and approval. Modification to a previously approved plan must be submitted for approval at least ten days prior to implementation. The area shall not be accessible to persons under twenty-one years of age and shall have a sign posted to restrict access. Exceptions to this subsection must be approved in writing by the commission.

(3) The authorized gaming operator shall submit controls for approval by the commission, that include the following for operating the designated sports wagering area:

(a) Specific procedures and technology partners to fulfill the requirements set forth by the commission;

(b) Other specific controls as designated by the commission;

(c) A process to easily and prominently impose limitations or notification for wagering parameters, including, but not limited to, deposits and wagers; and

(d) An easy and obvious method for a player to make a complaint and to enable the player to notify the commission if such complaint has not been or cannot be addressed by the sports wagering operator.

(4) The commission shall develop policies and procedures to ensure a prohibited participant is unable to place a sports wager or parimutuel wager.

(5) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 9-1312, prior to the winnings payment of any sports wagering winnings as defined in section 9-1303, an authorized gaming operator shall check the collection system to determine if the winner has a debt or an outstanding state liability as required by the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If such authorized gaming operator determines that the winner is subject to the collection system, the operator shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding state liability identified in the collection system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings payment of sports wagering winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount deducted to the Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or outstanding state liability as provided in section 9-1306.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 34;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 20;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB415, § 6.

Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act, see section 9-1301.